North Carolina, session 2025, HB1100.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. COMMUNITY COLLEGE CONSTRUCTION WORKFORCE PROGRAM
SECTION 1.(a) Program Established. – There is established the Community College
Construction Workforce Program (Program). The purpose of the Program is to provide funds to
community colleges in the State to establish credentialing programs for high-demand
construction trades. For the purposes of this section, "high-demand construction trades" include
electricians, plumbers, carpenters, roofers, HVAC (heating, ventilation, and air conditioning)
technicians, or other similar trades with skills applicable to and used in the construction of
residential structures.
SECTION 1.(b) Program Funds. – The Community Colleges System Office shall
provide funds to community colleges seeking to establish credentialing programs for
high-demand construction trades. In order to receive funds, a community college must submit a
written request to the Community Colleges System Office detailing the credentialing programs
to be established with the funds and how the funds will be used to establish the credentialing
program. The Community Colleges System Office shall notify the requesting community college
of the approval or denial of the request within 30 days of receipt of the written request.
*H1100-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) Community College Reporting Requirement. – Each community
college that receives funds shall submit a report to the Community Colleges System Office by
June 30 of each year that funds are received detailing the following:
(1) How funds distributed through the Program were used to establish
high-demand construction trades credentialing programs at the community
college, including which high-demand construction trades credentialing
programs were established.
(2) The number of students achieving credentials for high-demand construction
trades during the most recent academic year compared to the prior academic
year.
(3) Which specific credential programs were established using Program funds.
(4) Any further plans by the community college to establish other high-demand
construction trades.
SECTION 1.(d) Community Colleges System Office Reporting Requirement. – The
Community Colleges System Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee on the results of the Program by October 1, 2027, and each year thereafter that funds
are available for the Program on the following:
(1) The number of community colleges that applied for funds, the number of
community colleges that received funds, and the amount of funds received by
each community college.
(2) The number of high-demand construction trades credentialing programs that
were established, broken down by specific trade credentials.
(3) The total number of high-demand construction trades credentials awarded by
colleges in the Community Colleges System compared to previous years.
(4) Any other information the Community Colleges System Office deems
relevant.
SECTION 1.(e) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Community Colleges System Office the sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for the purposes of this section.
The Community Colleges System Office may use up to ten percent (10%) of the funds
appropriated pursuant to this section to administer the Program and promote the Program to the
public. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall not revert but shall remain available
until expended.

PART II. CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS PRODUCER INCENTIVE GRANT
PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Commerce (Department) the nonrecurring sum of one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to, and used for purposes consistent
with, the Construction Materials Producer Incentive Grant Program created by subsection (b) of
this section.
SECTION 2.(b) Construction Materials Producer Incentive Grant Program. – The
Department shall administer a grant program using funds allocated in subsection (a) of this
section to provide grants to producers of construction materials to incentivize investment in
production capacity for construction materials. For purposes of this section, "construction
materials" include lumber, engineered wood, concrete, cement substitutes, HVAC (heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning) components, windows, doors, and any other material,
component, or system assembly that is a standard item used in the construction of buildings or
infrastructure. Grants under the program shall be subject to the following conditions, which shall
be in addition to any conditions imposed by rules created by the Department pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section:
Page 2 House Bill 1100-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The maximum award amount under the program, per producer of construction
materials, shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000).
(2) Grants from the program shall only be awarded to producers of construction
materials that (i) invest a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the
State and (ii) create an average of 250 FTE jobs during the "grant period." For
purposes of this subdivision, a "grant period" is a period of time, not to exceed
five years, during which producers of construction materials are eligible to
receive grants under the program.
SECTION 2.(c) Rules; Report. – The Department shall adopt rules to implement the
grant program created by this section. Beginning September 15, 2026, and continuing annually
thereafter until all funds have been awarded, the Department shall submit a report on the grant
program to the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight
Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 2.(d) Effective Date. – This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART III. CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS REGULATIONS
SECTION 3.(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(1) Nationally recognized cement substitute. – A cementitious material used as a
partial replacement for portland cement that conforms to a standard
promulgated by ASTM International, the American Association of State
Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO), or another nationally
recognized consensus standards organization.
(2) Portland-limestone cement. – Portland-limestone cement conforming to
ASTM C595/C595M, Type IL.
SECTION 3.(b) Code Amendments Required. – To implement this section, the
following shall apply:
(1) The Building Code Council shall, in accordance with G.S. 143-138(a) and
G.S. 143-138(d), amend those parts of the North Carolina State Building Code
volumes specified in subdivisions (1) through (9) of G.S. 143-138(a) that
apply to commercial and multifamily construction to explicitly allow the use
of portland-limestone cement and nationally recognized cement substitutes,
as defined in subsection (a) of this section, in construction regulated by those
parts of the Code.
(2) The Residential Code Council shall, in accordance with G.S. 143-138(a) and
G.S. 143-138(d), amend those parts of the North Carolina State Building Code
volumes specified in subdivisions (1) through (10) of G.S. 143-138(a) that
apply to residential construction to explicitly allow the use of
portland-limestone cement and nationally recognized cement substitutes, as
defined in subsection (a) of this section, in construction regulated by those
parts of the Code.
SECTION 3.(c) Effective Date. – This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART IV. E-PERMITTING GRANT FUNDS
SECTION 4.(a) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Information Technology the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be provided in the form of grants to local
governments in this State for the purpose of establishing e-permitting systems.
SECTION 4.(b) Effective Date. – This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
House Bill 1100-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective
when it becomes law.
Page 4 House Bill 1100-First Edition